Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 8. Department of Housing and Community Development.
§ 36-139.
Powers and duties of Director.

The Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall have the following responsibilities:

Collecting from the governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth information relevant to their planning and development activities, boundary changes, changes of forms and status of government, intergovernmental agreements and arrangements, and such other information as he may deem necessary.

Making information available to communities, planning district commissions, service districts and governmental subdivisions of the Commonwealth.

Providing professional and technical assistance to, and cooperating with, any planning agency, planning district commission, service district, and governmental subdivision engaged in the preparation of development plans and programs, service district plans, or consolidation agreements.

Assisting the Governor in the providing of such state financial aid as may be appropriated by the General Assembly in accordance with §

15.2-4216

.

Administering federal grant assistance programs, including funds from the Appalachian Regional Commission, the Economic Development Administration and other such federal agencies, directed at promoting the development of the Commonwealth’s communities and regions.

Developing state community development policies, goals, plans and programs for the consideration and adoption of the Board with the ultimate authority for adoption to rest with the Governor and the General Assembly.

Developing a Consolidated Plan to guide the development and implementation of housing programs and community development in the Commonwealth for the purpose of meeting the housing and community development needs of the Commonwealth and, in particular, those of low-income and moderate-income persons, families and communities.

Determining present and future housing requirements of the Commonwealth on an annual basis and revising the Consolidated Plan, as necessary to coordinate the elements of housing production to ensure the availability of housing where and when needed.

Assuming administrative coordination of the various state housing programs and cooperating with the various state agencies in their programs as they relate to housing.

Establishing public information and educational programs relating to housing; devising and administering programs to inform all citizens about housing and housing-related programs that are available on all levels of government; designing and administering educational programs to prepare families for home ownership and counseling them during their first years as homeowners; and promoting educational programs to assist sponsors in the development of low and moderate income housing as well as programs to lessen the problems of rental housing management.

Administering the provisions of the Industrialized Building Safety Law (§

36-70

et seq.).

Administering the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.).

Establishing and operating a Building Code Academy for the training of persons in the content, application, and intent of specified subject areas of the building and fire prevention regulations promulgated by the Board of Housing and Community Development.

Administering, in conjunction with the federal government, and promulgating any necessary regulations regarding energy standards for existing buildings as may be required pursuant to federal law.

Identifying and disseminating information to local governments about the availability and utilization of federal and state resources.

Administering, with the cooperation of the Department of Health, state assistance programs for public water supply systems.

Advising the Board on matters relating to policies and programs of the Virginia Housing Trust Fund.

Designing and establishing program guidelines to meet the purposes of the Virginia Housing Trust Fund and to carry out the policies and procedures established by the Board.

Preparing agreements and documents for loans and grants to be made from the Virginia Housing Trust Fund; soliciting, receiving, reviewing and selecting the applications for which loans and grants are to be made from such fund; directing the Virginia Housing Development Authority and the Department as to the closing and disbursing of such loans and grants and as to the servicing and collection of such loans; directing the Department as to the regulation and monitoring of the ownership, occupancy and operation of the housing developments and residential housing financed or assisted by such loans and grants; and providing direction and guidance to the Virginia Housing Development Authority as to the investment of moneys in such fund.

Establishing and administering program guidelines for a statewide homeless intervention program.

Administering 15 percent of the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) Block Grant and any contingency funds awarded and carry over funds, furnishing home weatherization and associated services to low-income households within the Commonwealth in accordance with applicable federal law and regulations.

Developing a strategy concerning the expansion of affordable, accessible housing for older Virginians and Virginians with disabilities, including supportive services.

Serving as the Executive Director of the Commission on Local Government as prescribed in §

15.2-2901

and perform all other duties of that position as prescribed by law.

Developing a strategy, in consultation with the Virginia Housing Development Authority, for the creation and implementation of housing programs and community development for the purpose of meeting the housing needs of persons who have been released from federal, state, and local correctional facilities into communities.

Administering the Private Activity Bonds program in Chapter 50 (§

15.2-5000

et seq.) of Title 15.2 jointly with the Virginia Small Business Financing Authority and the Virginia Housing Development Authority.

Developing a statement of tenant rights and responsibilities explaining in plain language the rights and responsibilities of tenants under the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq.) and maintaining such statement on the Department’s website. The Director shall also develop and maintain on the Department’s website a printable form to be signed by the parties to a written rental agreement acknowledging that the tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities as required by §

55.1-1204

. The Director may at any time amend the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and such printable form as the Director deems necessary and appropriate. The statement of tenant rights and responsibilities shall contain a plain language explanation of the rights and responsibilities of tenants in at least 14-point type. The statement shall provide the telephone number and website address for the statewide legal aid organization and direct tenants with questions about their rights and responsibilities to contact such organization.

Developing a statement of tenant rights and responsibilities explaining in plain language the rights and responsibilities of tenants under the Virginia Manufactured Home Lot Rental Act (§

55.1-1300

et seq.) and maintaining such statement on the Department’s website. The Director shall also develop and maintain on the Department’s website a printable form to be signed by the parties to a written rental agreement acknowledging that the tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities as required by §

55.1-1303

. The Director may at any time amend the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and such printable form as the Director deems necessary and appropriate. The statement of tenant rights and responsibilities shall contain a plain language explanation of the rights and responsibilities in at least 14-point type. The statement shall provide the telephone number and website address for the statewide legal aid organization and direct tenants with questions about their rights and responsibilities to contact such organization.

Developing a sample termination notice that includes language referencing acceptance of rent with reservation by a landlord following a breach of a lease by a tenant in accordance with §

55.1-1250

. The sample termination notice shall be in at least 14-point type and shall be maintained on the Department’s website.

Carrying out such other duties as may be necessary and convenient to the exercise of powers granted to the Department.

History.

1977, c. 613; 1978, cc. 737, 751; 1981, cc. 309, 315; 1982, c. 36; 1986, c. 427; 1988, c. 687; 1989, cc. 258, 279; 1992, c. 754; 1994, cc. 44, 140; 1998, c. 693; 2002, cc. 245, 461, 555; 2003, c. 197; 2006, c. 721; 2007, cc. 647, 741; 2008, c. 445; 2013, c. 754; 2016, c. 305; 2020, cc. 985, 986; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91, 92, 410.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 596, cl. 1 provides: “That an appropriate additional point or points shall be credited to any application or request for state funds, including but not limited to, grants, loans, or subsidies of any kind, for projects related to economic, housing, community, or infrastructure development, which application documents a benefit to three or more political subdivisions of the Commonwealth by such project.”

Acts 1998, c. 693, cl. 4 provides: “That an interagency agreement between the Departments of Social Services and Housing and Community Development be developed detailing the administrative responsibilities of each agency.”

Acts 1998, c. 693, cl. 5 provides: “That the regulations promulgated by the State Board of Social Services before July 1, 1998, relating to the weatherization component of the Virginia Energy Assistance Program shall continue in effect until final regulations are adopted by the Board for Housing and Community Development, at which time the regulations of the State Board of Social Services shall be superseded. The Board of Housing and Community Development shall adopt regulations relating to the weatherization component of the Virginia Energy Assistance Program in accordance with the emergency regulation provisions of the Administrative Process Act (former
§ 9-6.14:1 et seq. — see now §

2.2-4000

et seq.).”

Acts 2016, c. 305, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall in no way alter or affect any (i) tax credit or tax benefit or other tax attribute allowed or earned under any section repealed by this act or (ii) tax liability or obligation pursuant to any such section.”

Acts 2020, cc. 985 and 986, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable in the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other applicable provisions of the Code of Virginia relating to eviction procedures in residential landlord-tenant cases for the purpose of providing input into (i) the development of the form to be developed by the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development for posting on its website pursuant to §

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, acknowledging that a tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and (ii) any updates to the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable in the Virginia Manufactured Home Lot Rental Act (§

55.1-1300

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other applicable provisions of the Code of Virginia for the purposes of providing input into (i) the development of the form to be developed by the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development for posting on its website pursuant to §

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, acknowledging that a tenant has received from the landlord the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities and (ii) any updates to the statement of tenant rights and responsibilities.”

Acts 2021, c. 410, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable of the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act (§

55.1-1200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other relevant provisions of the Code of Virginia related to eviction procedures in residential landlord and tenant cases, to provide input to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development (the Director) regarding the development of the sample termination notice required to be developed by the Director pursuant to §

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subdivision 4, substituted “§

15.2-4216

” for “§ 15.1-1412”; added present subdivision 23, and redesignated former subdivision 23 as present subdivision 24.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 245 added subdivision 25.

The 2002 amendment by c. 461 substituted “Consolidated Plan” for “Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy” in subdivisions 7 and 8; and in subdivision 7, inserted “and community development” twice, and substituted
“and families” for “families and communities.”

The 2002 amendment by c. 555 substituted “persons in the content, application, and intent of specified subject areas of the building and fire prevention regulations” for “personnel in building regulations” in subdivision 14.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 197 substituted “15” for “fifteen” in subdivision 23; deleted former subdivision 24, which read: “Carrying out such other duties as may be necessary and convenient to the exercise of powers granted to the Department”; redesignated former subdivision 25 as subdivision 24; and added subdivisions 25 and 26.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 721 added subdivision 26 and redesignated former subdivision 26 as subdivision 27.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 647 and 741, effective July 1, 2008, are identical, and deleted former subdivision 13, which read: “Administering the provisions of the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (§

27-94

et seq.).”; redesignated former subdivisions 14 through 27 as subdivisions 13 through 26.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 445 added subdivision 26 and redesignated former subdivision 26 as subdivision 27.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 754 substituted “Virginia Housing Trust Fund” for “Virginia Housing Partnership Revolving Fund” in subdivisions 17 through 19, and in subdivision 19, inserted “and the Department” following “Virginia Housing Development Authority” and substituted “Department” for “Virginia Housing Development Authority.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 305 deleted subdivision 20, which read “Advising the Board on matters relating to policies for the low-income housing credit and administering the approval of low-income housing credits as provided in §

36-55.63

” and renumbered remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 985 and 986 are identical, and added subdivision 26 and renumbered accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 91 and 92, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted subdivision 27 and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 410, effective July 1, 2021, inserted subdivision 27, which was subsequently renumbered as subdivision 28 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

§ 36-139.01.
Department to develop form; smoke alarms in rental units.

On or before January 1, 2019, the Department, in consultation with the Department of Fire Programs, shall develop a form (i) providing a landlord’s certification that the smoke alarms in a rental unit have been inspected and are in good working order; (ii) summarizing the obligations of a landlord relative to the maintenance of smoke alarms; and (iii) summarizing the obligations of a tenant relative to the maintenance of smoke alarms. Such form may be updated by the Department as needed. The Department and the Department of Fire Programs shall post the form required by this section on each agency’s website.

History.

2018, cc. 41, 81.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 41 and 81, cl. 3 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 36-139.1.
Sale of real property for housing demonstration projects.

The Director is authorized to sell surplus real property belonging to the Commonwealth that is placed under the control of the Department for the purpose of establishing owner-occupied residential housing demonstration projects, with the prior written approval of the Governor or his designee, who shall first consider the written recommendation of the Director of the Department of General Services. The methods, terms and conditions of sale shall be developed in cooperation with the Department of General Services. Any contract of sale or deed of conveyance shall be approved as to form by the Attorney General or one of his deputies or assistant attorneys general. The proceeds from all such sales shall be handled in the manner prescribed in subsection I of §

2.2-1156

.

History.

1988, c. 195; 2009, c. 612; 2019, cc. 659, 660; 2022, c. 761.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 612 substituted “subsection H” for “subsection D” in the last sentence.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 659 and 660 are identical, and substituted “subsection J” for “subsection H”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 158 substituted “I” for “J” in the last sentence.

§§ 36-139.2 through 36-139.4.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 647 and 741, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2008.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the State Fire Marshal’s qualifications, powers and duties, including power to arrest, to procure and serve warrants and to issue summonses, and limitation on authority, see §

9.1-206

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-139.2

, which provided for appointment of a State Fire Marshal and specified qualifications, powers and duties, and certain limitation on authority of the State Fire Marshal, was enacted by Acts 1989, c. 258.

Former § 36-139.3, which authorized inspection of certain state-owned, state-operated or state-licensed facilities and enforcement of safety standards by the State Fire Marshal, was derived from Acts 1989, c. 258; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1995, c. 243; 1997, c. 144.

Former § 36-139.4 authorized agreements between Department and other agencies, and was enacted by Acts 1989, c. 258.

§ 36-139.5.
Power to enter into agreements with owners of housing developments eligible for federal low-income housing credits.

The Department may enter into agreements with the owners of housing developments which are or will be eligible for low-income housing credits under the United States Internal Revenue Code.
Any such agreement shall contain covenants and restrictions as shall be required by the United States Internal Revenue Code and such other provisions as the Department shall deem necessary or appropriate.
Any such agreement shall be enforceable in accordance with its terms in any court of competent jurisdiction in the Commonwealth by the Department or by such other persons as shall be specified in the United States Internal Revenue Code.
Any such agreement, when duly recorded as a restrictive covenant among the land records of the jurisdiction or jurisdictions in which the development is located, shall run with the land and be binding on the successors and assigns of the owner.
All references in this section to the United States Internal Revenue Code shall include any amendments thereto and any regulations promulgated thereunder, as the foregoing may be or become effective at any time.

History.

1992, c. 455.

§ 36-139.5:1.
Eligibility for Industrial Site Development Program.

The Department, in determining eligibility for the Industrial Site Development Program, shall allow exceptions to the Department’s minimum requirement of 200 net developable acres because of geographic topographic or land availability limitations.

History.

2001, c. 65.

§ 36-139.6.
Additional powers and duties of Director; oversight of planning district commissions.

The Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall have the following powers and duties relating to oversight of planning district commissions:

To recommend to the Governor the level of state general appropriation funding for each planning district commission, taking into consideration the minimum funding level necessary for operation, the population of each district, and other factors considered appropriate;

To distribute state general appropriation funding to planning district commissions consistent with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 42 (§

15.2-4200

et seq.) of Title 15.2;

To administer the Regional Cooperation Incentive Fund in accordance with §

15.2-4217

;

To provide technical assistance to planning district commissions regarding regional approaches to area-wide problems. Assistance may be initiated by the Department, individual local governments, or planning district commissions;

To require the submission of annual programmatic and financial information by each planning district commission in a format prescribed by the Director;

To prepare a biennial report to the Governor and the General Assembly which identifies the activities and other information deemed appropriate by the Director concerning planning district commissions, including findings as to planning district commissions which are not complying with Chapter 42 (§

15.2-4200

et seq.) of Title 15.2. Copies of the biennial report shall also be sent to the Commission on Local Government, Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity, Department of Conservation and Recreation, Department of Environmental Quality, Department of Planning and Budget, Department of Transportation, Virginia Economic Development Partnership, and others upon request; and

To establish the Virginia Planning District Commission Council made up of the chairman or designated representative from each planning district commission to advise Department staff on programs, rules and regulations for the planning district commissions. Technical committees of planning district commission staff, state and local agency staff, and private sector individuals as needed, may be created.

History.

1995, cc. 732, 796; 1996, cc. 589, 590, 598, 599; 2013, c. 482.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 596, cl. 1 provides: “That an appropriate additional point or points shall be credited to any application or request for state funds, including but not limited to, grants, loans, or subsidies of any kind, for projects related to economic, housing, community, or infrastructure development, which application documents a benefit to three or more political subdivisions of the Commonwealth by such project.”

Acts 2013, c. 482, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2014.”

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 589 and 599 are identical, and near the middle of subdivision 6, inserted “Department of Business Assistance” and deleted “Department of Economic Development.”

The 1996 amendments by cc. 590 and 598 are identical, and in subdivision 6, inserted “Department of Business Assistance,” deleted “Department of Economic Development,” and substituted “Virginia Economic Development Partnership” for “Virginia Employment Commission.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 482, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Small Business and Supplier Diversity” for “Business Assistance” in the second sentence of subdivision 6.

§ 36-139.7.
Boundaries of planning districts.

The Department shall review the boundaries of planning districts following every United States decennial census of population. The Department shall also review the boundaries upon the request of a member jurisdiction of a planning district. An initial review shall be conducted prior to July 1, 1996. Upon concluding such review, the Department shall, subject to the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.), make adjustments to the boundaries of planning districts as it deems advisable.

The Department shall consider the following criteria in making determinations as to the governmental subdivisions to be included in a planning district: recognition of communities of interest among the governmental subdivisions, recognition of common economic and market interests, the ease of communications and commissioner travel time, metropolitan statistical area boundaries designated by the federal government, a population base adequate to ensure financial viability, and geographic factors and natural boundaries. In making such determination, the Department shall also consider the wishes of a governmental subdivision within or surrounding a proposed planning district, as expressed by resolution of its governing body.

In conducting the boundaries review, the Department shall consult with the governing bodies of the governmental subdivisions within and adjoining a planning district which is proposed to be changed and shall hold such public and other hearing as it may deem advisable, provided at least one public hearing shall be held in each planning district which is proposed to be changed.

To the extent practical, upon completion of a statutory review of planning district boundaries, state agencies may provide for sorting local statistical data according to planning district geography for external use of information for state, regional and local strategic and economic development planning.

History.

1995, cc. 732, 796.

§ 36-139.8.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-139.8

, which established the Alternative Water Supply Assistance Fund
and provided for grants for alternative water supply assistance, was enacted by Acts 2001, c. 314.

§ 36-140.
Repealed by Acts 1995, cc. 732 and 796.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-140

, concerning the changes to boundaries of planning districts, was derived from Acts 1979, c. 672; 1990, c. 722.